Nevada, session 83, SB158.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. NRS 624.031 is hereby amended to read as follows:
624.031 The provisions of this chapter do not apply to:
1. Work performed exclusively by an authorized representative
of the United States Government, the State of Nevada, or an
incorporated city, county, irrigation district, reclamation district, or
other municipal or political corporation or subdivision of this State.
2. Any entity that is recognized as exempt under section
501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code, 26 U.S.C. § 501(c)(3),
which:
-
*SB158*

– 2 –
(a) Enters into a contract or other agreement with the State of
Nevada, or an incorporated city, county, irrigation district,
reclamation district, or other municipal or political corporation or
subdivision of this State, to facilitate the repair or maintenance of
properties, including, without limitation, weatherization and energy
efficiency services;
(b) Facilitates work to be performed on such a property by a
person licensed pursuant to this chapter; and
(c) Is a party with the owner of such a property and a person
licensed pursuant to this chapter to a contract or agreement for the
work on the property.
3. An officer of a court when acting within the scope of his or
her office.
4. Work performed exclusively by a public utility operating
pursuant to the regulations of the Public Utilities Commission of
Nevada on construction, maintenance and development work
incidental to its business.
5. An owner of property who is building or improving a
residential structure on the property for his or her own occupancy
and not intended for sale or lease. The sale or lease, or the offering
for sale or lease, of the newly built structure within 1 year after its
completion creates a rebuttable presumption for the purposes of this
section that the building of the structure was performed with the
intent to sell or lease that structure. An owner of property who
requests an exemption pursuant to this subsection must apply to the
Board for the exemption. The Board shall adopt regulations setting
forth the requirements for granting the exemption.
6. Any work to repair or maintain property the value of which
is less than [$1,000,] $5,000, including labor [and] but excluding
materials, unless:
(a) A building permit is required to perform the work;
(b) The work is of a type performed by a plumbing, electrical,
refrigeration, heating or air-conditioning contractor;
(c) The work is of a type performed by a contractor licensed in a
classification prescribed by the Board that significantly affects the
health, safety and welfare of members of the general public;
(d) The work is performed as a part of a larger project:
(1) The value of which is $500 or more; or
(2) For which contracts of less than $500 have been awarded
to evade the provisions of this chapter; or
(e) The work is performed by a person who is licensed pursuant
to this chapter or by an employee of that person.
7. The sale or installation of any finished product, material or
article of merchandise which is not fabricated into and does not
become a permanent fixed part of the structure.
-
*SB158*

– 3 –
8. The construction, alteration, improvement or repair of
personal property.
9. The construction, alteration, improvement or repair financed
in whole or in part by the Federal Government and conducted within
the limits and boundaries of a site or reservation, the title of which
rests in the Federal Government.
10. An owner of property, the primary use of which is as an
agricultural or farming enterprise, building or improving a structure
on the property for his or her use or occupancy and not intended for
sale or lease.
11. Construction oversight services provided to a long-term
recovery group by a qualified person within a particular geographic
area that is described in a proclamation of a state of emergency or
declaration of disaster by the State or Federal Government,
including, without limitation, pursuant to NRS 414.070. A long-
term recovery group may reimburse such reasonable expenses as the
qualified person incurs in providing construction oversight services
to that group. Except as otherwise provided in this subsection,
nothing in this subsection authorizes a person who is not a licensed
contractor to perform the acts described in paragraphs (a) and (b) of
subsection 1 of NRS 624.700. As used in this subsection:
(a) “Construction oversight services” means the coordination
and oversight of labor by volunteers.
(b) “Long-term recovery group” means a formal group of
volunteers coordinating response and recovery efforts related to a
state of emergency or disaster that is proclaimed or declared by the
State or Federal Government.
(c) “Qualified person” means a person who possesses the
abilities, education, experience, knowledge, skills and training that a
long-term recovery group has identified as being necessary to
provide construction oversight services for a project to be performed
by that group.
12. A person licensed as a real estate broker, real estate broker-
salesperson or real estate salesperson pursuant to chapter 645 of
NRS who, acting within the scope of the license or a permit to
engage in property management issued pursuant to NRS 645.6052,
assists a client in scheduling work to repair or maintain residential
property pursuant to a written brokerage agreement or a property
management agreement. Such assistance includes, without
limitation, assisting a client in the hiring of any number of licensed
contractors to perform the work. Nothing in this subsection
authorizes the performance of any work for which a license is
required pursuant to this chapter by a person who is not licensed
pursuant to this chapter or the payment of any additional
compensation to a person licensed as a real estate broker, real estate
-
*SB158*

– 4 –
broker-salesperson or real estate salesperson for assisting a client in
scheduling the work. The provisions of this subsection apply only if
a building permit is not required to perform the work and if the
value of the work does not exceed $10,000 per residential property
during the fixed term of the written brokerage agreement, if the
assistance is provided pursuant to such an agreement, or during a
period not to exceed 6 months if the assistance is provided pursuant
to a property management agreement. As used in this subsection:
(a) “Brokerage agreement” has the meaning ascribed to it in
NRS 645.005.
(b) “Property management agreement” has the meaning ascribed
to it in NRS 645.0192.
(c) “Real estate broker” has the meaning ascribed to it in
NRS 645.030.
(d) “Real estate broker-salesperson” has the meaning ascribed to
it in NRS 645.035.
(e) “Real estate salesperson” has the meaning ascribed to it in
NRS 645.040.
(f) “Residential property” means:
(1) Improved real estate that consists of not more than four
residential units; or
(2) A single-family residential unit, including a
condominium, townhouse or home within a subdivision, if the unit
is sold, leased or otherwise conveyed unit by unit, regardless of
whether the unit is part of a larger building or parcel that consists of
more than four units.
H
-
*SB158*